Tennessee, session 114, HB0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-36-107(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (28) and redesignating the existing subdivisions accordingly:
(28) To have such powers as are provided to water and wastewater treatment
authorities pursuant to § 68-221-607(a)(17)-(20), to the extent that the authority's
exercise of such powers does not conflict with any ordinances or rules adopted by
another local government having jurisdiction over such matters;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0660
002738
- 1 -